Maine, session 132, LD1804.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 3 MRSA §521, as enacted by PL 1981, c. 702, Pt. S, is repealed and the
following enacted in its place:
§521. Committee
1. Oversight of financial matters. The joint standing committee of the Legislature
having jurisdiction over appropriations and financial affairs is authorized to provide
oversight of financial matters, excluding those items over which the Legislative Council
has statutory authority.
2. Oversight of Highway Fund. The joint standing committee of the Legislature
having jurisdiction over transportation matters is authorized to provide oversight of all
legislative matters related to the Highway Fund, including all allocations and subdivisions
of an allocation from the Highway Fund and excluding those items over which the
Legislative Council has statutory authority.
Sec. 2. 3 MRSA §522-C, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 392, Pt. L, §1, is amended to
read:
§522-C. Meetings of the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over transportation matters
The joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over transportation
matters shall oversee the transfer of funds in accordance with Title 23, section 1652 and
block grant changes in accordance with Title 5, section 1670 and any related fiscal matters.
The committee shall oversee all other allocations or subdivisions of allocations to the
Department of Transportation or the Secretary of State, Bureau of Motor Vehicles. The
committee shall also review all other financial orders related to the Highway Fund that
have been submitted to the Office of Fiscal and Program Review since the committee's last
meeting. The committee may meet monthly or as often as is determined necessary by the
chairs.
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §1665, sub-§7, as repealed and replaced by PL 1999, c. 127, Pt.
A, §6 and affected by §7, is amended by enacting at the end a new first blocked paragraph
to read:
On or before September 1st of even-numbered years, beginning in fiscal year 2030-31 and
each biennium thereafter, the State Budget Officer shall adjust the minimum level of
funding amounts outlined in Title 23, section 1656 by the percentage change in the
Consumer Price Index from the 2 complete calendar years preceding the biennial budget.
Sec. 4. 23 MRSA §52, as amended by PL 2023, c. 516, Pt. B, §43, is further amended
to read:
§52. General powers and duties
The Department of Transportation, referred to in this chapter as "the department," may
from time to time make and shall enforce rules and regulations relating to the planning,
design, engineering, construction, improvement, maintenance and use of transportation
infrastructure. The department may from time to time make and shall enforce rules relating
to the manner of conducting all investigations and hearings and the administration of its
office, powers and duties. The department shall direct the expenditure of all money for the
Page 1 - 132LR1627(01)

413 planning, design, engineering, construction, improvement, demolition, maintenance and
424 use of all transportation infrastructure for which state funds are provided by law. The
435 department may conduct traffic survey interviews and other statistical studies on the state
446 highway system as considered necessary for the use in planning and development of the
457 statewide highway system. The department may obtain leases for such land and office
468 space as the department considers necessary for the performance of its duties. As used in
479 this section, "transportation infrastructure" means infrastructure related to all modes of
580 transportation, including highways, bridges, railroads, ferries, mass transit, airports and
591 bicycle and pedestrian facilities, as well as all buildings, utilities, facilities and other
1502 appurtenances related to such modes has the same meaning as in section 4241, subsection
1513 1.
The department has full power to purchase all supplies, materials and equipment that
are incidental to, or necessary for, project-specific construction, improvement or
maintenance of transportation infrastructure. The purchase of supplies, materials and
equipment for nonproject-specific purposes must be made through the Chief Procurement
Officer as provided by law. For the purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise
indicates, "project-specific" means relating to a specific location for a limited duration, as
opposed to perennial, nonlocation-specific activities. The department may be consulted by
and shall, without charge, advise municipal officers and road commissioners on the subject
of construction, improvement and maintenance of public highways, bridges and other
structures. The department shall whenever practicable give preference in employment to
the inhabitants of the town in which such highways are located.
The department may adopt its own guidelines for determining the reasonableness and
permissibility of various cost factors, including, but not limited to, salary limits, benefits
and expense reimbursement. Notwithstanding any other federal or state law to the contrary,
the department's guidelines must be used in lieu of federally mandated provisions.
Sec. 5. 23 MRSA §1651, as amended by PL 1971, c. 593, §22, is further amended
to read:
§1651. Definition Highway Fund established
To provide funds for the construction of state, state aid and town ways, for the
maintenance of state and state aid highways, and interstate, intrastate and international
bridges, and for other items of expenditure specified, there is established a fund to be
known as the General Highway Fund. This fund shall include includes all fees received
from the registration of motor vehicles and licensing of operators thereof, all fees accruing
to the Treasurer of State under Title 25, section 1502, the receipts from the tax on internal
combustion engine fuels, the portion of funds collected for automobile-related sales tax
pursuant to Title 36, section 1821 transferred to the fund and all sums received on account
of the department for permits to open highways, or from other sources, the disposition of
which is not otherwise designated by law. After payment from said General Highway Fund
of such sums for interest and retirement as are necessary to meet the provisions of bond
issues for state highway and bridge construction, the remainder of said fund shall must be
allocated, segregated, apportioned and expended as provided by the Legislature.
Sec. 6. 23 MRSA §1653, as amended by PL 1995, c. 65, Pt. A, §62 and affected by
§153 and Pt. C, §15, is further amended to read:
§1653. Limitation on use of fund
Page 2 - 132LR1627(01)

All revenue received by the State from the registration of motor vehicles and the
licensing of operators thereof, from the tax imposed on internal combustion engine fuel,
from fines, forfeitures and costs accruing to the State under Title 29‑A, section 2602, from
the portion of the funds collected for automobile-related sales tax under Title 36, section
1821, and from permits granted by the department to open highways must be segregated,
allocated to and become part of the General Highway Fund created and existing by statute,
and after payment and deduction from such fund of such sums as are necessary to meet all
provisions of bond issues for state highway and bridge construction, the remainder of such
fund must be apportioned and expended solely:
1. Registration and licensing. For the cost of registering motor vehicles and licensing
the operators thereof;
2. State police. For maintenance of the State Police. This subsection is repealed July
1, 2027;
3. Administration of office. For administration of the office and duties of the
department;
4. Administration of fuel tax. For administration of the tax on internal combustion
engine fuel;
5. Rebates. For payment of rebates on said tax;
6. Highways and bridges. For the improvement, construction and maintenance of
highways and bridges;
7. Snow guards. For snow guards or removal as provided by statute.; and
8. Multimodal transportation. Pursuant to the Constitution of Maine, Article IX,
Section 19, for the planning, design, engineering, construction, improvement, maintenance,
operation, purchase, management, demolition or other use of all modes of transportation,
including public highways, bridges, aviation, transit, railroads, ferries, ports and other
marine infrastructure, trails, pedestrian and bicycle facilities and transportation
infrastructure as defined in section 4241.
Neither the General The Highway Fund, nor or any fund derived from direct taxation
imposed for highway construction, bridge construction or the improvement and
maintenance thereof, shall may not be diverted or expended, permanently, for any other
purpose than set forth in this section, except that funds so segregated may be used for other
appropriations but only those for which anticipated income has not been received and for
which financial provision has been made by the Legislature and is forthcoming. The
Treasurer of State is directed and authorized to reimburse the General Highway Fund by a
deposit of the funds received from such aforesaid appropriations, the receipt of which has
been anticipated, to the extent of the amounts temporarily diverted therefrom. Such
deposits shall must be made as soon as such revenues are collected.
Sec. 7. 23 MRSA §1656 is enacted to read:
§1656. Funding for transportation capital projects
1. Minimum funding. Beginning July 1, 2027, allocations from the Highway Fund
must meet the minimum level of funding for each of the following purposes:
A. For construction and maintenance of highway bridges, $150,000,000;
Page 3 - 132LR1627(01)

B. For the construction and maintenance of highway lights, $20,000,000; and
C. For multimodal transportation, $30,000,000.
2. Adjustments. On or before September 1st of the even-numbered years, beginning
in fiscal year 2030-31 and each biennium thereafter, the State Budget Officer shall adjust
the minimum level of funding amounts outlined in this section by the percentage change in
the Consumer Price Index from the 2 complete calendar years preceding the biennial
budget.
Sec. 8. 23 MRSA §1984 is enacted to read:
§1984. Report; procurement
Beginning March 1, 2026, and every March 1st of even-numbered years thereafter, the
authority shall submit a report to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over transportation matters. The report must summarize the authority's
procurement activities over the preceding 2 calendar years. The summary must include the
type and amount of construction contracting, consulting contracts for engineering and other
technical services, including general consulting agreements and task order contracts, and
other vendor contracts.
Sec. 9. 23 MRSA §4241, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 313, §6, is amended to read:
§4241. Definitions
As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Transportation infrastructure. "Transportation infrastructure" means
infrastructure, assets, facilities and systems related to all modes of transportation, including
highways, bridges, aviation, transit, railroads, ferries, mass transit, airports ports and other
marine infrastructure, trails and bicycle and pedestrian facilities, as well as all buildings,
utilities, facilities and other appurtenances related to those modes.
2. Transportation-related services. "Transportation-related services" means all
services necessary or convenient to discharge the powers, duties and responsibilities of the
department and the commissioner as provided by law including those provided in section
4206. These services include all services necessary or convenient to plan, design, engineer,
construct, improve, demolish, maintain, operate or use transportation infrastructure. These
services may include, but are not limited to, planning and feasibility studies, engineering,
surveying, mapping, environmental services, architectural-related services, appraisal, title
services, right-of-way services, project and program management, construction support
services and equal opportunity and civil rights services.
Sec. 10. 23 MRSA §4245 is enacted to read:
§4245. Report; procurement
Beginning March 1, 2026, and every March 1st of even-numbered years thereafter, the
department shall submit a report to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over transportation matters. The report must summarize the department's
procurement activities over the preceding 2 calendar years. The summary must include the
type and amount of construction contracting, consulting contracts for engineering and other
Page 4 - 132LR1627(01)

412 technical services, including general consulting agreements and task order contracts, and
423 other vendor contracts.
Sec. 11. 25 MRSA §1509-A, as amended by PL 2013, c. 354, Pt. F, §1 and c. 368,
Pt. EEE, §1, is repealed and the following enacted in its place:
§1509-A. Funding
Beginning in fiscal year 2027-28, state funding for the Department of Public Safety,
Bureau of State Police is appropriated from the General Fund.
Sec. 12. 30-A MRSA §6054, sub-§5, as repealed and replaced by PL 2023, c. 189,
Pt. H, §5 and affected by §6, is repealed and the following enacted in its place:
5. Use of fund after bond retirement. Beginning July 1, 2027 and every July 1st
thereafter, after all liquor operation revenue bonds and any ancillary obligations secured
by the fund have been retired, any amounts received pursuant to Title 28-A, section 90
must be deposited as undedicated revenue to the General Fund.
Sec. 13. 36 MRSA §1821, 3rd ¶, as amended by PL 2025, c. 9, Pt. F, §8, is further
amended to read:
When Until June 30, 2026, when notified by the assessor, the State Controller shall
transfer 40% of the amount in the notice, after the reduction for transfer to the Local
Government Fund pursuant to Title 30‑A, section 5681, subsection 5, from the General
Fund to the Highway Fund. The and the State Controller shall transfer 22% of the amount
transferred to the Highway Fund to the TransCap Trust Fund established in Title 30‑A,
section 6006‑G. Beginning July 1, 2027, and every July 1st thereafter, when notified by
the assessor, the State Controller shall transfer 60% of the amount in the notice, after the
reduction for transfer to the Local Government Fund pursuant to Title 30-A, section 5681,
subsection 5, from the General Fund to the Highway Fund and the State Controller shall
transfer 22% of the amount transferred to the Highway Fund to the TransCap Trust Fund
established in Title 30‑A, section 6006‑G.
Sec. 14. Effective date. Those sections of this Act that repeal and replace the Maine
Revised Statutes, Title 3, section 521; Title 25, section 1509-A; and Title 30-A, section
6054, subsection 5 take effect July 1, 2027.